Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-179
Person committed; physical examination; evaluation; contents; recommendations.

Upon initial admission to a facility, each person committed to the department shall be given a physical examination and a thorough evaluation. The evaluation shall include such person's psychological, social, educational, and vocational condition and history and the motivation of the offense. A report containing the findings of the examination and evaluation shall be submitted on each such person to the chief executive officer of the facility. The report shall include recommendations regarding the facility to which such person should be assigned, the degree and kind of custodial control, and the program of treatment for rehabilitation, including medical and psychological treatment and educational and vocational training. A medical determination shall be made as to whether such person shall be kept apart from other persons committed to the department.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 10, p. 3078;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 30.